Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 536.050 is amended to read:
536.050. (1) The Water Resources Department may collect the following fees in advance:
(a) For examining an application for a permit:
(A) To appropriate water, except as provided under ORS 543.280 for an application for a  hy-
droelectric project:
(i) A base fee  of [ $930] $1,090 for an appropriation of water through a single use, point of di-
version or point of appropriation;
(ii) [ $350] $410 for the first second-foot or fraction thereof appropriated under the permit;
(iii) [ $350] $410 for each additional second-foot or  fraction thereof appropriated under the per-
mit;
(iv) [ $350] $410 for each additional use, point of  diversion or point of appropriation included in
the application;
(v) If appropriating stored water, [ $35] $41 for the  first acre-foot or fraction thereof up to 20
acre-feet, plus [ $1.20] $1.40 for each additional acre-foot or fraction thereof; and
(vi) If appropriating ground water, in addition to any other fees, [ $410] $480 for each application
filed.
(B) To store water under ORS 537.400 or 537.534 (4):
(i) A base fee of [ $930] $1,090;
(ii) [ $35] $41 for the first acre-foot or fraction thereof  up to 20 acre-feet, plus [ $1.20] $1.40 for
each additional acre-foot or fraction thereof; and
(iii) [ $140] $160 for each additional storage location.
(C) To exclusively appropriate stored water:
(i) A base fee of [ $520] $610; and
(ii) [ $35] $41 for the first acre-foot or fraction  thereof up to 20 acre-feet, plus [ $1.20] $1.40 for
each additional acre-foot or fraction thereof.
(b) For a permit issued under  ORS 537.147, 537.211, 537.409 or 537.625 to appropriate or store
water:
(A) A base fee of [ $520] $610 for recording the permit; and
(B) An additional fee of  [$670] $790 if the permit is issued pursuant to a final order that contains
provisions requested by the applicant for mitigating impacts to the proposed water source.
Enrolled House Bill 2142 (HB 2142-INTRO) Page 1
(c) For filing and recording the assignment or  partial assignment of a water right application,
permit or license under ORS 537.220 or 537.635, [ $100] $120.
(d) For copying records in the department, [ $2.30] $2.70 for the first  page and [ 60] 70 cents for
each additional page.
(e) For certifying copies, documents, records or maps, [ $12] $14 for each certificate.
(f) For a blueprint copy of any map or drawing, the actual cost of the work.
(g) For a computer-generated map, the actual cost of the work.
(h) For examining an application for approval of a change to an existing water right or permit:
(A) A base fee of [ $1,160] $1,360 for a change to a single water right or permit;
(B) [ $930] $1,090 for each additional type of change requested;
(C) For a request for a change in place of use  or type of use or for a water exchange under ORS
540.533, [$350] $410 for each second-foot or fraction thereof requested beyond the first second-foot;
(D) [ $520] $610 for each additional water right or permit included in the application; [ and]
(E) An additional fee of [ $410] $480 per application, if the application is for  an additional point
of appropriation, a change in a point of appropriation or a change  from surface water to ground
water or for substitution as described in ORS 540.524[ .]; and
(F) $410 for each additional point of appropriation included in the application.
(i) For examining an application for a temporary change in place of use under ORS  540.523, for
a temporary transfer under ORS 540.585 or for a temporary change in  place of use, a change in the
point of diversion to allow for the appropriation of ground water or a change of a primary right  to
a supplemental right under ORS 540.570, a base fee of [ $810] $950 for  the first water right or permit,
plus [ $260] $310 for each additional water right or permit included in the application and:
(A) For nonirrigation uses, [ $200] $230 for each second-foot or fraction thereof  requested beyond
the first second-foot; or
(B) For irrigation uses, [ $2.30] $2.70 per acre of land  irrigated or, if the application and required
map are submitted to the department in a department-approved digital format, [ 60] 70 cents  per acre
of land irrigated.
(j) For submitting a protest to the department:
(A) [ $810] $950 if the protest is by a nonapplicant; and
(B) [ $410] $480 if the protest is by an applicant.
(k) For filing an application for extension of time within which irrigation or other works  shall
be completed or a water right perfected, [ $670] $780.
(L) For a limited license under ORS 537.143 or 537.534 (2), the fee established  by rule by the
Water Resources Commission.
(m) For filing,  examining and certifying a petition under ORS 541.329, [ $410] $480 plus 10 cents
per acre of  water involved in the application. For purposes of computing this fee, when any acreage
within a quarter quarter of a section is involved, the 10 cents per acre shall  apply to all acres in
that quarter  quarter of a section. Notwithstanding the fee amount established in this paragraph, a
district notifying the department under ORS 541.327 (4) shall pay the  actual cost of filing, examining
and certifying the petition.
(n) For requesting standing under ORS 537.153, 537.621 or 543A.120, [ $230] $270.
(o) For participating in a contested case proceeding under ORS 537.170, 537.622  or 543A.130,
[$580] $680.
(p) Except for an applicant, for obtaining a copy of both a proposed final  order and a final order
for a water right application  under ORS 537.140 to 537.252, 537.505 to 537.795 or 543A.005 to
543A.300 or an extension issued under ORS 537.230, 537.248 or 537.630, [ $30] $35.
(q) For examining an application to store water under ORS 537.409:
(A) A base fee of [ $410] $480; and
(B) [ $35] $41 for each acre-foot or fraction thereof.
(r) For submitting a notice  of intent under ORS 543A.030 or 543A.075, the amount established
by the Water Resources Director under ORS 543A.410.
(s) For examining an application for a substitution made under ORS 540.524:
Enrolled House Bill 2142 (HB 2142-INTRO) Page 2
(A) A base fee of [ $840] $990 for the first well substitution; and
(B) A fee of [ $410] $480 for each additional well substitution.
(t) For examining an application for an allocation of conserved water under ORS 537.455  to
537.500:
(A) A base fee of [ $1,160] $1,360 for the first water right that is part of the allocation; and
(B) An additional fee of [ $410] $480 for each water right that is part of the allocation beyond
the first water right.
(u) For submitting a water  management and conservation plan pursuant to rules of the com-
mission:
(A) [ $580] $680, if the plan is submitted by an agricultural water supplier;
(B) [ $1,040] $1,220, if the plan is submitted by a municipal water supplier serving a  population
of 1,000 or fewer persons; or
(C) [ $2,090] $2,450, if the plan is submitted by a municipal water supplier serving a population
of more than 1,000 persons.
(v) For examining a new application for an in-stream water right lease under ORS 537.348:
(A) [ $520] $610 for an application for a lease with four or more landowners or  four or more
water rights; or
(B) [ $350] $410 for all other applications.
(w) For examining an application for an in-stream water right lease renewal, [ $130] $150.
(x) For  submitting a claim of beneficial use under a permit or transfer having a priority date
of July 9, 1987, or later, [ $200] $230.
(y) For submitting a request no later than 60 days after cancellation of a permit under  ORS
537.260 to reinstate the permit, [ $520] $610.
(z) For submitting a request for a basin program exception under ORS 536.295, [ $670] $780.
(aa) For processing an application under ORS  537.225 for an assignment of water right to one
or more landowners and issuance of replacement water right permits, the actual cost of the work.
(2)(a) The department may charge a dam owner an annual fee based upon the dam’s hazard
rating as determined by the department. The fees the department may charge the dam owner are:
(A) [ $100] $120 for a dam with a low hazard rating.
(B) [ $200] $230 for a dam with a significant hazard rating.
(C) [ $670] $790 for a dam with a high hazard rating.
(D) If the dam owner fails to pay an annual fee on or before six months after the billing  date,
a late fee of [ $120] $140.
(b) If a dam owner fails to pay an annual fee or a late fee charged by the department, the de-
partment may, after  giving the dam owner notice by certified mail, place a lien on the real property
where the dam is located for the fees owed by the dam owner.
(3) Notwithstanding the  fees established under subsection (1) of this section, the commission may
establish lower examination and permit fees by rule for:
(a) The right to appropriate water for a storage project of five acre-feet or less; or
(b) The right to appropriate water for the purpose of  allowing the applicant to water livestock
outside of a riparian area, as that term is defined in ORS 541.890.
(4)(a) The director may  refund all or part of a fee paid to the department under this section if
the director determines that a refund of the fee is appropriate in the interests  of fairness to the
public or necessary to correct an error of the department.
(b) The director may refund all  or part of the protest fee described in subsection (1)(j) of this
section to the legal owner or occupant who filed a protest under ORS  540.641 if an order of the
Water Resources Commission establishes that all or part of a water right has not been canceled or
modified under ORS 540.610 to 540.650.
(5) The director may waive all or part of a fee for a change to  a water right permit under ORS
537.211 (4), a change to a water right subject to transfer under ORS 540.520 or 540.523 or an allo-
cation of conserved water under ORS 537.470, if the change or allocation of conserved water is:
(a) Made pursuant to ORS 537.348;
Enrolled House Bill 2142 (HB 2142-INTRO) Page 3
(b) Necessary to complete a project funded under ORS 541.932; or
(c) Approved by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife as a change or  allocation of con-
served water that will result in a net benefit to fish and wildlife habitat.
(6) Notwithstanding the fees established pursuant to this section, the commission  may adopt by
rule reduced fees for persons submitting materials to the department in a digital  format approved
by the department.
(7) All moneys received under this section, less any amounts refunded under subsection (4)  of
this section, shall be deposited in the Water Resources Department Water Right Operating Fund.
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (7) of this section,  all fees received by the department for power
purposes under ORS  543.280 shall be deposited in the Water Resources Department Hydroelectric
Fund established by ORS 536.015.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 537.150 is amended to read:
537.150. (1) Within 15 days  after receiving an application, the Water Resources Department shall
determine whether the  application contains the information listed under ORS 537.140 (1) and is
complete and not defective, including the payment of all fees required under ORS 537.140 (5).  If the
department determines that the application  is incomplete or defective or that not all fees have been
paid, the department shall return the fees paid and the application.
(2) Upon determining that an application contains the  information listed under ORS 537.140 (1)
and is complete and not defective, the department shall  indorse on the application the date upon
which the application was  received at the department, which shall be the priority date for any water
right issued in response to the application. All applications that comply  with the provisions of law
shall be recorded in a suitable book kept for that purpose.
(3) If an application is complete and not defective,  the department shall determine whether the
proposed  use  is prohibited by ORS chapter 538. If the proposed use is prohibited by ORS chapter
538, the  department shall reject the application and return all fees to the applicant with an expla-
nation of the statutory prohibition.
(4) If the proposed use is  not prohibited by ORS chapter 538, the department shall undertake
an initial review of the application and make a preliminary determination of:
(a) Whether the proposed use is restricted or limited by statute or rule;
(b) The extent to which water is available from the proposed source during the times and in the
amounts requested; and
(c) Any other issue the department identifies as a result  of the initial review that may preclude
approval of or restrict the proposed use.
(5) Upon completion of the initial review and  no later than 30 days after determining an appli-
cation to be complete and not defective as  described in subsection (1) of this section, the department
shall notify the applicant of its preliminary determinations and allow the applicant 14 days from the
date of mailing within which to notify the department to  stop processing the application or to pro-
ceed with the application. If the  applicant notifies the department to stop processing the application,
the department shall return the application and all fees paid in excess of [ $260] $310. If the  depart-
ment receives no timely response from the applicant,  the department shall proceed with the appli-
cation.
(6) Within seven days after proceeding with the application under subsection  (5) of this section,
the department shall give public notice of the  application in the weekly notice published by the
department. The notice shall include a request for comments on the application  and information
pertaining to how an interested person may obtain future notices  about the application and a copy
of the proposed final order.
(7) Within 30 days after the public notice under subsection  (6) of this section, any person in-
terested in the application shall submit written comments  to the department. Any person who asks
to receive a copy of the department’s proposed final order shall submit to the department  the fee
required under ORS 536.050 (1).
SECTION 3.
 ORS 537.610 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2142 (HB 2142-INTRO) Page 4
537.610. (1)  The Water Resources Commission shall accept all registration statements referred
to in ORS 537.605 completed and returned to the commission in proper form, endorse  on the regis-
tration statement the date of the return and  record each statement. Upon recording the statement,
the commission shall issue to the registrant a certificate  as evidence that the registration is com-
pleted.
(2) The issuance of the certificate of  registration serves as prima facie evidence that the regis-
trant is entitled to a right to appropriate ground water and apply it to beneficial  use to the extent
and in the manner disclosed in the recorded registration statement  and in the certificate of regis-
tration.
(3) A certificate of registration issued under this section  may not be construed as a final de-
termination of any matter stated in the  certificate of registration. The right of the registrant to
appropriate ground water under a certificate of registration  is subject to determination under ORS
537.670 to 537.695, and is  not final or conclusive until so determined and a ground water right cer-
tificate issued. A right  to appropriate ground water under a certificate of registration has a tenta-
tive priority from the date when the construction of the well was begun.
(4) The commission shall adopt by rule the process and  standards by which the commission will
recognize changes in the place of use, type of use  or point of appropriation for claims to appropriate
ground water registered under this section. The commission shall adopt fees not  to exceed [ $1,450]
$1,820 for actions taken to modify a certificate of registration.
SECTION 4.  ORS 537.620 is amended to read:
537.620. (1) The Water Resources Department shall accept all applications for permits submitted
under ORS 537.615 in proper form.
(2) Within 15 days after receiving the application, the department shall determine whether  the
application contains the information listed under ORS  537.615 (2) and is complete and not defective,
including the payment of all fees required under ORS 537.615 (5). If  the department determines that
the application is incomplete or defective or that not all  fees have been paid, the department shall
return the fees paid and the application to the applicant to remedy the defect. If an application  is
complete and not defective, the department shall indorse on the application the  date upon which the
application was received at the department, which shall be the priority date for any water right is-
sued in response to the application.
(3) Upon  determining that an application is complete and not defective, the department shall
determine whether the proposed use is prohibited by statute. If the proposed use  is prohibited by
statute, the department shall reject the application  and return all fees to the applicant with an ex-
planation of the statutory prohibition.
(4) If the proposed use is not prohibited by statute, the department  shall undertake an initial
review of the application and make a preliminary determination of:
(a) Whether the proposed  use is restricted or limited by statute or rule or because the proposed
use is located within a designated critical ground water area;
(b) The extent to which water is available from the proposed source during the times and in the
amounts requested; and
(c) Any other issue the department identifies as a result  of the initial review that may preclude
approval of or restrict the proposed use.
(5) Upon completion of the initial review and no later  than 30 days after determining an appli-
cation to be complete and not defective as  described in subsection (2) of this section, the department
shall notify the applicant of its preliminary determinations and allow the applicant 14 days from the
date of mailing within which to notify the  department to stop processing the application or to pro-
ceed with the application. If the  applicant notifies the department to stop processing the application,
the department  shall return the application and all fees paid in excess of [ $260] $310. If the depart-
ment receives no timely response from the applicant,  the department shall proceed with the appli-
cation.
(6) Within seven days after proceeding with the application under subsection  (5) of this section,
the department shall give public notice of the application  in the weekly notice published by the
Enrolled House Bill 2142 (HB 2142-INTRO) Page 5
department. The notice  shall include a request for comments on the application and information
pertaining to how an interested person may  obtain future notices about the application and a copy
of the proposed final order.
(7) Within 30 days after the public notice under subsection  (6) of this section, any person in-
terested in the application shall submit written comments  to the department. Any person who asks
to receive a copy of the department’s proposed final order shall submit to the department  the fee
required under ORS 536.050 (1)(p).
SECTION 5.  ORS 539.081 is amended to read:
539.081. (1) At the time the owner or registrant submits  a registration statement under ORS
539.240 or,  if a registration statement is not filed, when a statement and proof of claim is filed
pursuant to notice by the Water Resources Director under ORS 539.030, the owner or  registrant
shall pay a fee as follows:
(a) If for irrigation use, [ $2.30] $2.70  for each acre of  irrigated lands up to 100 acres and
[$1.20] $1.40 for each acre in excess of 100 acres. The minimum fee for any owner or registrant  for
irrigation use shall be [ $120] $140.
(b) If for power use, [ $2.30] $2.70  for each theoretical horsepower up to 100 horsepower, [ 90
cents] $1.10 for each horsepower in excess of  100 up to 500 horsepower, [ 60] 70  cents for each
horsepower in excess of 500 horsepower up to 1,000 horsepower and [ 40] 50 cents for each  horse-
power in excess of 1,000 horsepower, as set forth in the proof. The minimum fee for any  owner or
registrant for power use shall be [ $350] $410.
(c) If  for mining or any other use, [ $580] $680 for the first second-foot or fraction of the first
second-foot and [ $120] $140 for each additional second-foot.
(2) The fees  under subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any federally recognized In-
dian tribe, or to the United States acting as trustee for such a  tribe, claiming, under ORS 539.010,
an undetermined vested right to the use of surface water for any nonconsumptive and nondiverted
in-stream use to satisfy tribal hunting, fishing or gathering rights.
(3) If the registration statement shows that the water right was initiated  by making application
for a permit under the provisions of ORS chapter 537, the owner or registrant shall  be given credit
for the money  paid as examination and recording fees. A credit under this subsection shall be al-
lowed only if the  application under ORS chapter 537 was for a permit to appropriate water to be
applied to the same parcel of land or for the same use as set forth in the registration statement.
(4) All  fees paid under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund of the State
Treasury and credited to an account of the Water Resources Department. The fees shall  be used to
pay for the expenses of the department to:
(a) Register claims to undetermined vested rights or  federal reserved rights under ORS 539.230
and 539.240; and
(b) Determine claims filed or registered under ORS 539.230 and 539.240.
(5) No registration statement or statement and proof of  claim shall be accepted for filing unless
the registration statement or claim is  accompanied by the fee in the amount set forth in this section.
If the federal government is determined  to be immune from the payment of such fees, the director
may elect to accept a federal claim for filing without the accompanying fees.
SECTION 6.
If this  2021 Act becomes law after July 1, 2021, the Legislative Assembly
intends that this 2021  Act shall apply retroactively to July 1, 2021. Fees charged by the Water
Resources Department consistent with the amendments to ORS 536.050,  537.150, 537.610,
537.620 and 539.081 by sections 1 to 5 of this 2021  Act, for services provided on or after July
1, 2021, and prior to the effective date of this 2021 Act are ratified and declared valid.
SECTION 7. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 2142 (HB 2142-INTRO) Page 6
Passed by House June 21, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2142 (HB 2142-INTRO) Page 7